California statutes. Water Code
The agency may use proceeds of bonds authorized by this division for the construction, reconstruction, or improvement of any works carried out by the agency. The agency may also make proceeds of bonds authorized by this division available to other local public agencies on mutually satisfactory terms and conditions to assist in the construction, reconstruction, or improvement of works designed and intended in whole or in part to furnish water to the members of the agency, whether those works are carried out jointly by the agency and other local public agencies, or solely by those other public agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81435.

The agency may impose reasonable rates, fees, and charges on Stanford University, the California Water Service Company, and the agency’s member public entities for any program or service provided or work performed by the agency. The agency may also impose reasonable rates, fees, and charges on any other public or private entity that enters into a contract with the agency for use of any program or service provided or work performed by the agency. These rates, fees, and charges shall be at least sufficient to generate revenue to pay the principal and interest on any bonds issued by the agency to carry out the work. The agency shall be solely responsible for servicing the debt on any bonds it issues and the State of California has no responsibility for those bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Additional Financing Authority [81436. - 81438.]

81436.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “BAWSCA members” means Stanford University, the California Water Service Company, and eligible public entities as defined by Section 81305.

(b) “July 2009 Water Supply Agreement” means the water supply agreement by and between the City and County of San Francisco and the BAWSCA members, as amended or supplemented.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (AB 2167)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

81436.5.

The agency may prepay all or a portion of any unpaid principal balance relating to the existing capital assets as of June 30, 2009, on behalf of BAWSCA members, as provided in the July 2009 Water Supply Agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (AB 2167)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

81437.

(a) (1) The agency may acquire from the City and County of San Francisco the right to receive all or a portion of the amounts payable by BAWSCA members under the July 2009 Water Supply Agreement.

(2) The City and County of San Francisco may sell to the agency its right to receive amounts payable by BAWSCA members under the July 2009 Water Supply Agreement.

(b) (1) If the agency acquires, and the City and County of San Francisco sells, the right to receive amounts payable pursuant to subdivision (a), if requested by the agency, the City and County of San Francisco
 shall continue to collect amounts payable by BAWSCA members under the July 2009 Water Supply Agreement in accordance with the terms of that agreement and the City and County of San Francisco shall transfer amounts so collected to the agency on a monthly basis or on a periodic basis agreed to by the agency and the City and County of San Francisco.

(2) The agency shall apply amounts received pursuant to this subdivision to pay debt service on any bonds issued by the agency for a use authorized by Section 81437.5 and to satisfy all other obligations of the agency related to these bonds.

(3) The agency may distribute any amounts received pursuant to this subdivision not needed for the purposes of this subdivision to BAWSCA members. The agency may condition any distribution pursuant
 to this paragraph upon BAWSCA members’ agreement to waive any right of prepayment respecting any amounts purchased that the member may have under the July 2009 Water Supply Agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (AB 2167)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

81437.5.

In addition to the uses authorized in Section 81434, the agency may use proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this division as follows:

(a) For the construction, reconstruction, or improvement of any works carried out by the agency on behalf of a BAWSCA member.

(b) For the purpose of assisting in the repayment of any existing capital assets, if those assets were designed and intended in whole or in part to furnish water to BAWSCA members, whether those assets were carried out jointly by the agency and other local public agencies, or solely by those other public agencies.

(c) To make a prepayment, as described in Section 81436.5, or
 an acquisition, as described in Section 81437.

(d) To pay the costs of issuance of the bonds and to fund reserve funds securing the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (AB 2167)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

81438.

(a) In addition to the authority granted in Section 81435, the agency may do all of the following:

(1) Impose reasonable rates, fees, and charges on BAWSCA members for any program or service provided or work performed by the agency.

(2) Impose rates, fees, and charges on BAWSCA members and any entity that subsequently serves a BAWSCA member’s service area in an amount as shall be necessary, together with other available sources of funds, to pay debt service on any bonds issued by the agency for a use authorized by Section 81437.5 and to satisfy all other obligations of the agency related to these bonds, including,
 but not limited to, funding and maintaining reserve funds and complying with financial covenants.

(3) Distribute any amounts collected that are not needed for the purposes of this article to BAWSCA members.

(b) If requested by the agency, the City and County of San Francisco shall collect any rates, fees, and charges imposed by the agency pursuant to this section as a surcharge under the July 2009 Water Supply Agreement. These amounts shall be collected in a manner, and with remedies for nonpayment, specified in an agreement between the agency and the City and
 County of San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (AB 2167)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Controversies [81440. - 81442.]

81440.

The agency may sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings and in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81441.

All claims for money or damages against the agency are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81442.

An action to determine the validity of any contract, or any bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Water Supply [81445. - 81452.]

81445.

The agency may do all of the following:

(a) Acquire water and water rights within or outside the state.

(b) Develop, store, and transport water.

(c) Provide, deliver, and sell water at wholesale for municipal, domestic, and industrial purposes to any city, county, district, other local public entity, public utility, or mutual water company located within the boundaries of the agency, and to Stanford University.

(d) Acquire, construct, operate, and maintain any and all works, facilities, improvements, and property within or outside the boundaries of the agency necessary or convenient to carry out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81446.

The agency may conduct studies of the water supplies available to its members, and their current and future demand for water. The agency may develop plans for projects and programs that can assist its members to meet those future water needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81447.

The agency may provide, deliver, and sell water not needed for municipal, domestic, or industrial uses within the boundaries of the agency for beneficial purposes but shall give preference to users within the agency. The supply of surplus water shall in every case be subject to the paramount right of the agency to discontinue that supply in whole or in part upon one year’s notice to the purchaser or user of that surplus water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81448.

The agency may not sell water to any retail user within the boundaries of the agency. Sales to Stanford University shall not be deemed sales to a retail user.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81449.

Except as provided in Section 81452, the agency may exercise the right of eminent domain in the manner provided by law to acquire any property, within or outside the boundaries of the agency, necessary or convenient to carry out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81450.

The agency is entitled to the benefit of any reservation or grant, in all cases, where any right has been reserved or granted to the state, or any agency or political subdivision thereof, or any public corporation, to construct or maintain water-related facilities in, under, or over any public or private lands. Nothing in this section authorizes the agency to construct facilities on lands owned or controlled by San Francisco without the consent of San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81451.

The agency may construct and operate works and facilities in, under, over, across, or along any street or public highway or over any of the lands which are the property of the state to the same extent that those rights and privileges are granted to cities within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81452.

The agency may not acquire by eminent domain, interfere with, or exercise any control over, any water distribution facility owned and operated by any city, city and county, local public entity, or public utility without the consent of, and upon those terms that are mutually agreed to by, that city, city and county, local public agency, or public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Changes in Organization [81455. - 81456.7.]

81455.

Any territory annexed to, or detached from, a member public entity, upon completion of the annexation or detachment, shall be deemed annexed to, or detached from, the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81456.

(a) A public entity identified in Section 81305 that is not a member at the time the agency is formed pursuant to Section 81328 may thereafter join the agency, with the approval of the board of the agency and subject to those terms and conditions that the board determines are necessary to ensure that the new member pays an equitable share of the costs previously incurred by the agency.

(b) The new member shall appoint one director and, for the purposes of this division, the new member shall be subject to the water delivery amounts described in Section 81460 that apply to that new member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81456.5.

San Francisco may become a member of the agency pursuant to Section 81456.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81456.7.

Not later than 10 days after the date on which any new member is admitted, the agency shall notify in writing the Secretary of State with regard to the name of the new member and the date of its admission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Miscellaneous [81457. - 81461.]

81457.

Membership of a public entity in the agency does not affect the identity or legal existence, nor impair the powers, of that public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81459.

This division shall be liberally construed to carry out its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81460.

(a) The water delivery quantities set forth in subdivision (b) describe, for the purposes of this division, the average daily deliveries of water from San Francisco to the identified entities during the 2000–01 fiscal year.

(b) The water delivery quantities are as follows:NameAverage Daily Deliveries in 
Hundred Cubic FeetAlameda County Water District15,709California Water Service Company49,610City of Brisbane489City of Burlingame6,503City of Daly City6,070City of East Palo Alto2,864City of Hayward24,546Town of Hillsborough5,099City of Menlo Park4,616City of Millbrae3,669City of Milpitas9,437City of Mountain View14,860City of Palo Alto18,438City of Redwood City15,753City of San Bruno3,266City of San Jose6,436City of Santa Clara5,473City of Sunnyvale13,112Coastside County Water District2,070Estero Municipal Improvement District7,873Guadalupe Valley Municipal Improvement District611Mid-Peninsula Water District4,789North Coast County Water District4,594Purissima Hills Water District2,921Stanford University3,604Westborough Water District1,352(c) If San Francisco becomes a member of the agency, the average daily delivery of water to San Francisco during the 2000–01 fiscal year, for the purposes of this division, shall be determined to be 118,973 hundred cubic feet.

(d) If one of the entities listed in subdivision (b) succeeds, whether by merger, consolidation, acquisition, assignment, or otherwise, to the rights and obligations of another entity under the July 2009 Water Supply Agreement, or any subsequent water supply contract, the successor entity’s
 quantity of water shall be increased, for purposes of Section 81405, by the amount of the nonsucceeding entity’s quantity of water, without the necessity for an amendment to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 63, Sec. 5.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

81461.

Nothing in this act changes the governance, control, or ownership of the regional water system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 31.7. SAN FRANCISCO BAY AREA REGIONAL WATER SYSTEM FINANCING AUTHORITY [81600. - 81674.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [81600. - 81610.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [81600. - 81601.]

81600.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the San Francisco Bay Area Regional Water System Financing Authority Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81601.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The City and County of San Francisco has acquired or constructed a system of reservoirs, pipelines and tunnels, and treatment plants that provides water to 2.4 million Californians who live in San Francisco and in neighboring communities in Alameda, San Mateo, and Santa Clara Counties.

(b) Over two-thirds of the Californians who rely on San Francisco’s regional water system, approximately 1.6 million persons, live outside San Francisco. A substantial majority of industrial, commercial, institutional, and governmental users are also located in neighboring communities rather than in San Francisco itself.

(c) The reliability of this water infrastructure system is of vital importance to the health, welfare, safety, and economy of the region which it supplies.

(d) In turn, this region is of vital importance to the entire State of California, because of the resident industries, universities, and commercial enterprises that employ millions of Californians and generate billions of dollars in exports and tax revenues to the state.

(e) The regional water system is old, designed to outdated seismic safety standards, and either crosses or is located on, or adjacent to, three major active earthquake faults, the Calaveras Fault, the San Andreas Fault, and the Hayward Fault. Engineering investigations have disclosed that the system is at risk of catastrophic failure in a major earthquake. Many areas in all four counties now served, in the event of a major earthquake, face possible interruptions in their supplies of potable water for up to 30 days, and some areas could be without water for as long as 60 days.

(f) Interruptions in water supply of this magnitude and duration to a densely populated metropolitan region could be disastrous for public health and safety and for the regional and state economy. In addition, uncontrolled releases of water from pipelines, tunnels, and reservoirs could create severe flood damage and environmental harm to fish and wildlife habitat in the communities in which those facilities are located.

(g) Pursuant to the terms of the master water sales contract between the City and County of San Francisco and its wholesale customers, the retail water customers of the City and County of San Francisco provide the initial financing for the construction of improvements to the regional water system, and the wholesale customers do not pay for those improvements until those improvements are placed into service.

(h) Many separate cities, special districts, and public utilities are responsible for the distribution of water in portions of the bay area served, on a wholesale basis, by the San Francisco regional water supply system. The distribution of responsibility among many agencies impedes coordinated regional actions, including financing, to respond to the crisis.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature to enable the City and County of San Francisco, and the entities in Alameda, San Mateo, and Santa Clara Counties that rely on the San Francisco regional water system, acting collectively, to secure funds necessary to implement the prompt construction and reconstruction of the San Francisco regional water system, and to make those funds available to the City and County of San Francisco for projects designed and intended in substantial part to improve the reliability of the regional water system, including, but not limited to, strengthening the system’s ability to withstand seismic events.

(j) It is not the intent of the Legislature to change the governance structure, operational control, or existing ownership of San Francisco’s regional water system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [81602. - 81610.]

81602.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81603.

“Authority” means the San Francisco Bay Area Regional Water System Financing Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81604.

“Board” means the board of directors of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81606.

“Master water sales contract” means the document entitled “Settlement Agreement and Master Water Sales Contract between the City and County of San Francisco and Certain Suburban Purchasers in San Mateo County, Santa Clara County, and Alameda County,” dated July 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81608.

“Project” means a work and all of the activities related to, or necessary for, the acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance of a work including, but not limited to, planning, design, financing, contracting, project management, and administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81608.5.

“Public entities” means San Francisco and the public entities in the Counties of Alameda, San Mateo, and Santa Clara that purchase water from San Francisco pursuant to the July 2009 Water Supply Agreement, or any subsequent water supply contract, that include Alameda County Water District, City of Brisbane, City of Burlingame, Coastside County Water District, City of Daly City, City of East Palo Alto, Estero Municipal Improvement District, Guadalupe Valley Municipal Improvement District, City of Hayward, Town of Hillsborough, City of Menlo Park, Mid-Peninsula Water District, City of Millbrae, City of Milpitas, City of Mountain View, North Coast County Water District, City of Palo Alto, Purissima Hills Water District, City of Redwood City, City of San Bruno, City of
 San Jose, City of Santa Clara, City of Sunnyvale, and Westborough Water District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

81609.

“Regional water system” means facilities for the storage, treatment, and transmission of water operated and maintained by San Francisco located in the Counties of Tuolumne, Stanislaus, San Joaquin, Alameda, Santa Clara, San Mateo, and three terminal reservoirs in San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81610.

“San Francisco” means the City and County of San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Creation of Authority [81615. - 81615.]

81615.

(a) The San Francisco Bay Area Regional Water System Financing Authority is hereby created.

(b) The members of the authority include the public entities identified in Section 81608.5, Stanford University, and the California Water Service Company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Government of Authority [81628. - 81643.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board of Directors [81628. - 81637.]

81628.

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81629.

(a) The governing body of each member public entity, other than San Francisco, shall appoint one voting member to the board of the authority. Subject to Section 81673, the governing body of San Francisco shall appoint one nonvoting member to the board of the authority. Each director shall be a registered voter and reside within the boundaries of the member public entity whose governing board appoints him or her.

(b) For the purposes of subdivision (a), the governing body of a member public entity may appoint one of its own members to the board if the person otherwise meets the requirements of that subdivision.

(c) (1) The Board of Supervisors of San Mateo County shall appoint one voting member to the board who is a resident of San Mateo County, receives water from the California Water Service Company, and is not an officer or employee of the California Water Service Company.

(2) The Board of Supervisors of Santa Clara County shall appoint one voting member to the board who is a resident of Santa Clara County, receives water from Stanford University, and is not an officer or employee of Stanford University.

(d) If a person appointed pursuant to this section ceases to possess the qualifications for this office set forth in this section, the office shall become vacant and the vacancy shall be filled pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 81631.

(e) No incompatibility of office shall result from an elected official serving on the board of the authority and on the governing board of a member public entity.

(f) The initial appointments shall be made not later than March 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81630.

Each director, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, shall take the oath of office as provided for in the Constitution and laws of the state. The chairperson or vice chairperson of the board, or the secretary of the agency, may administer the oath.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 63, Sec. 7.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

81631.

(a) Each director shall serve for a term of four years.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the directors initially appointed to the board shall determine, by lot, that one-half plus one of their number shall serve for four years and the remaining directors shall serve for two years. Thereafter, each appointing authority shall appoint a person to replace its respective director or may reappoint its director for an unlimited number of terms.

(c) A vacancy on the board shall be filled by the respective appointing authority not later than 90 days from the date of the occurrence of the vacancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81632.

Each director who is not an officer or employee of an appointing entity may receive compensation in an amount prescribed by the board, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at meetings of the board, not to exceed four meetings in any calendar month. In addition, each director may be reimbursed for actual, necessary, and reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of duties performed at the request of the board. The compensation of directors may be increased pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20200) of Division 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81633.

A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. The board may act only by ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81634.

The board shall hold its first meeting as soon as possible after the appointment of the initial directors. At its first meeting, and at its first meeting in January each year thereafter, the board shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson from among its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81635.

The board shall provide for the time and place of holding its regular meetings. All meetings of the board shall be called and held in accordance with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81636.

Each voting director has one vote on any ordinance, resolution, or motion before the board. Except as provided in Section 81653, the affirmative vote of a majority of all voting members of the board is necessary and sufficient to carry any motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81637.

(a) On all ordinances and resolutions, the roll shall be called and ayes and noes recorded in the minutes of the proceedings of the board.

(b) Motions may be adopted by voice vote, except that the roll shall be called at the request of any director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Officers and Employees [81640. - 81643.]

81640.

The board shall appoint a general manager, a financial officer, and a secretary. The board may establish other offices that may be necessary or convenient. The board shall appoint, and prescribe the duties, compensation, and terms and conditions of employment of, all officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81641.

The board may employ other employees that the board determines are necessary or convenient and may delegate to the general manager the authority to employ or contract for the services of additional assistants or employees that the general manager determines to be necessary or convenient to operate the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81642.

The board may require, and establish the amount of, official bonds of officers and employees that are necessary for the protection of the funds and property of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81643.

(a) Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code applies to all officers and employees of the authority, except that a director may vote on a contract between the authority and the public entity that appointed him or her to the authority’s board. Notwithstanding the membership on the board of the members appointed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 81629, a contract between the authority and the California Water Service Company or between the authority and Stanford University does not violate Section 1090 of the Government Code, nor is that contract void or voidable under Section 1092 of the Government Code.

(b) The authority is a “local government agency” for purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions of Authority [81645. - 81662.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers [81645. - 81649.]

81645.

The authority may exercise the powers that are expressly granted by this division, together with other powers that are reasonably implied from those expressed powers, and powers necessary and proper to carry out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81646.

(a) The authority may make contracts of any nature, including, but not limited to, contracts to employ labor, to indemnify and hold harmless, and to do all acts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of its powers.

(b) The authority may contract with any department or agency of the United States or the state, or with any public or private entity, or person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81647.

The authority may take by grant, purchase, bequest, devise, or lease and may hold, enjoy, lease, sell, or otherwise dispose of real and personal property of any kind, within or outside the boundaries of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81648.

The authority may apply for and receive state and federal grants, loans, and other financial assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81649.

Nothing in this division changes the governance, control, or ownership of the regional water system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Financial Matters [81650. - 81658.]

81650.

The board shall adopt a budget for each fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81651.

The accounts of the authority shall be audited annually in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards by independent certified public accountants with experience in auditing the accounts of local public entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81652.

The authority may borrow money, incur indebtedness, and issue notes and bonds as provided in this division, or as otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81653.

(a) The authority may issue revenue bonds upon the adoption of an ordinance by a two-thirds vote of all of the voting members of the board, after notice and public hearing. For the purposes of issuing bonds pursuant to this subdivision, the authority need not conduct an election or otherwise secure the approval of the voters within the boundaries of the authority.

(b) The authority shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation at least 15 days before the date of the meeting at which the issuance of revenue bonds is to be considered and shall provide an opportunity for public comments during that meeting and before the directors vote on the issuance of those bonds.

(c) The authority may not issue any revenue bonds after December 31, 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 214, Sec. 3.   (SB 699)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

81654.

The authority may issue bonds for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds of the authority, whether due or not due.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81655.

The authority may issue negotiable promissory notes to acquire funds for any authority purpose. The notes shall have a term not to exceed five years. The total amount of notes issued pursuant to this section that may be outstanding at any one time may not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81656.

Bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the authority are legal investments for all trust funds and for funds of all insurers, commercial and savings banks, trust companies, and state schools. Funds that may be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other local entities may also be invested in bonds and other evidences of indebtedness of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81658.

(a) The proceeds of revenue bonds issued by the authority in accordance with this division may be used only on projects designed and intended in substantial part to improve the reliability of the regional water system, including, but not limited to, strengthening the system’s ability to withstand seismic events.

(b) The proceeds shall be made available for the purposes set forth in subdivision (a) upon terms and conditions that the board determines necessary and appropriate. The terms and conditions shall include, but are not limited to, San Francisco’s entering into one or more legally binding contracts with the authority that, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Identify specific projects and proposed completion dates, subject to reasonable delays, for which the proceeds are to be used.

(2) Grant to the authority the authority to oversee and audit the disposition of proceeds to third party consultants, suppliers, and contractors.

(3) Grant to the authority the authority to determine the procedure by which contracts are awarded to consultants, suppliers, and contractors, consistent with the requirements of San Francisco’s charter and ordinances.

(4) Grant to the authority the authority to inspect the construction of projects on which bond proceeds are expended.

(5) Require San Francisco to provide complete, accurate, and timely information to the authority on the expenditure of the bond proceeds.

(6) (A) (i) Require San Francisco, on behalf of the authority, to impose a surcharge on Stanford University, the California Water Service Company, and each of the public entities identified in Section 81608.5, other than San Francisco, in an amount that will generate sufficient revenue to pay the debt service on bonds issued by the authority and the operating expenses of the authority.

(ii) The surcharge shall be calculated annually by the authority as a uniform percentage of each entity’s water bill.

(B) Require San Francisco to impose the surcharge described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) on its retail water customers upon the occurrence of either of the following events:

(i) The voters of San Francisco approve a ballot measure authorizing retail water rates to be increased to pay for the retail water customer’s share of the debt service on bonds issued by the authority and the operating expenses of the authority.

(ii) The restrictions on water rate increases set forth in “Proposition H,” adopted by the voters of San Francisco on June 2, 1998, are not in effect.

(7) Require San Francisco to transmit the proceeds of the surcharge collected by San Francisco to the authority in the manner determined by the authority.

(8) Provide that, for the purposes of the master water sales contract, the revenue generated by the surcharge imposed pursuant to paragraph (6) does not constitute revenue of the regional water system or revenue as defined in San Francisco’s indenture of trust relating to its revenue bonds.

(9) Provide that the facilities constructed with the proceeds of bonds issued by the authority shall not be included in the wholesale system rate base.

(10) Provide for the continuation of the surcharge imposed pursuant to paragraph (6) after the expiration of the master water sales contract in 2009.
